Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1463
Parts shipped; how treated.

A warrantor may ship parts to the dealer so that such dealer will be able to carry out factory campaign work. If such parts are in excess of a dealer's requirements, the dealer may return the unused parts to the warrantor for credit after completion of the factory campaign.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 22.
October 1, 2026